Tennessee, session 114, HB0326.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 15, Chapter 2, is amended by adding
the following as a new section:
March 3 of every year is observed as "Sister Sandra Smithson Day," to honor the
immeasurable impact Sister Smithson had on this state by bettering the lives of children
in need through the power of improved educational opportunities and the founding of
Nashville's first charter school. This day is not a legal holiday as defined in § 15-1-101.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0326
002038
- 1 -